Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB278.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 16.060 is amended to read as follows:
(1) It shall be the duty of the commissioner, each officer of the department, and each individual employed as a
Trooper R Class or CVE R Class to:
(a) Detect and prevent crime;[,]
(b) Apprehend criminals;[,]
(c) Maintain law and order throughout the state;[,]
(d) [to ]Collect, classify, and maintain information useful for the detection of crime and the identification,
apprehension, and conviction of criminals; and
(e) [ to ]Enforce the criminal, [as well as the ]motor vehicle, and traffic laws of the Commonwealth.
(2) [To this end ]The commissioner, each officer of the department, and each individual employed as a Trooper R
Class or CVE R Class is individually vested with the powers of a peace officer and shall:
(a) Have in all parts of the state the same powers with respect to criminal matters and enforcement of [the
]laws [relating thereto ]as sheriffs, constables granted peace officer powers, and police officers in their
respective jurisdictions;[,] and[ shall ]
(b) Possess all the immunities and matters of defense now available or hereafter made available to sheriffs,
constables granted peace officer powers, and police officers in any suit brought against them in
consequence of acts done in the course of their employment.
(3) Any warrant of arrest may be executed by the commissioner, any officer of the department, and each
individual employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class.
(4) The commissioner shall allow officers of the department or individuals employed as a Trooper R Class or
CVE R Class to engage in law enforcement-related off-duty police employment and secondary employment
that:
(a) Has been reviewed and approved by the commissioner or his or her designee;
(b) Does not:
1. Create a conflict with the officer or individual's duties as an employee of the department;
2. Reflect unfavorably upon the department or the officer or individual; or
3. Impair the officer's or individual's performance of departmental duties;
(c) May include contracts involving:
1. Public entities;
2. Projects for which a contractor is providing services to a public entity, including but not
limited to the Transportation Cabinet;
3. Nonpublic entities that receive state funding; and
4. Ticketed events where public safety is a concern; and
(d) Shall not include contracts involving:
1. Retail establishments;
2. Weddings or private parties; or
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
3. Establishments or businesses that sell alcoholic beverages for on-site consumption as a
regular and primary part of the business enterprise.
(5) The commissioner shall establish policies and procedures consistent with subsection (4) of this section
related to off-duty police employment and secondary employment for officers of the department or
individuals employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class.
Section 2. KRS 16.070 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The commissioner is the head and chief executive officer of the department. He or she shall provide for
himself or herself, each officer of the department, and each individual employed as a Trooper R Class
or CVE R Class, under the provisions of KRS 45A.045 to 45A.650, such uniforms, equipment, and
facilities, including motor vehicles, necessary to the performance of their respective duties, but all
uniforms, equipment, and facilities, including motor vehicles, shall remain the property of the
Commonwealth.
(b) The commissioner may sell through the Finance and Administration Cabinet, under the provisions of
KRS 45A.045 to 45A.650, such uniforms, equipment, and facilities, including motor vehicles, as
become unfit for use, and all moneys received[ therefrom] shall be paid into the State Treasury and
credited to a revolving fund to be used by the department.
(2) The commissioner shall keep an inventory and shall charge against each officer and each individual employed
as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class the value of all property of the department issued to him or her, and if it
is determined by the commissioner that any loss or destruction of property was due to the carelessness or
neglect of an officer or an individual employed as a Trooper R Class, then the value of the property shall be
deducted from the pay of the officer or the individual employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class.
(3) (a) By agreement with the commissioner of highways of the Commonwealth, the commissioner of the
Department of Kentucky State Police may provide for the leasing of motor vehicles and accessories
thereto, radio facilities and equipment, office equipment, and other property or facilities, upon [such
]terms and conditions and for [such ]compensation as provided in the agreement[said agreement may
provide].
(b) The commissioner of highways and the commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police may
further provide, by agreement, for the service and repair at any state garage of motor vehicles or
accessories thereto which are owned, operated, or rented by the department, upon [such ]terms and
conditions and for [such ]compensation as provided in the agreement[said agreement may provide].
(c) Subject to KRS Chapter 42, the department is authorized, by lease or purchase, to acquire, maintain,
and operate motor vehicles, and the officers of the[said] department, including the commissioner and
individuals employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class, are authorized and empowered to operate
these[such] motor vehicles in the course of their duties, and in carrying out the purposes,
responsibilities, and functions provided for in KRS 16.010 to 16.170 in both an on-duty or off-duty
capacity.
(4) The commissioner shall establish local headquarters so as to best distribute the officers, individuals employed
as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class, and employees of the department throughout the various sections of the
Commonwealth where they will be most efficient in carrying out the provisions of KRS 16.010 to 16.199.
(5) The commissioner shall establish policies and procedures related to the approval and use of uniforms,
equipment, and facilities, including motor vehicles, necessary in the performance of an officer's or
individual's off-duty police employment or secondary employment.
Section 3. KRS 44.045 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A passenger motor vehicle or vehicles may be purchased by the Finance and Administration Cabinet for the
use of the Governor and the Lieutenant Governor.
(2) Motor vehicles, including passenger motor vehicles, may be purchased by the Finance and Administration
Cabinet as are deemed necessary by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet or by the
secretary of the Transportation Cabinet for the discharge of the authorized duties and functions of the various
agencies of the state. The vehicles shall be used for official purposes only and for no other purposes. The
assignment of passenger motor vehicles to specific individuals shall be discouraged but may be made upon
approval by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet of a written request to make the
assignment by the head of the agency involved.

CHAPTER 60 3
(3) (a) All motor vehicles purchased pursuant to this section shall be issued official license plates and shall
bear on one (1) door on each side the great seal of the Commonwealth, and the words "For official use
only."
(b) It shall not be necessary that the vehicles purchased pursuant to subsections (1), (4), and (5) of this
section bear the seal and the words.
(4) (a) The Department of Revenue, Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, and the Department of Law may, upon
approval by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet of a written request by the head of
the agency involved, register a vehicle or vehicles under KRS 186.020 and be issued regular license
plates.
(b) Except as provided in Sections 1 and 2 of this Act involving off-duty police employment by officers or
individuals employed as Trooper R Class or CVE R Class, the vehicles shall be used for investigatory
purposes only and for no other purposes.
(5) The Administrative Office of the Courts may register a vehicle or vehicles used by Justices and Judges of the
Supreme Court and Court of Appeals under KRS 186.020 and be issued regular license plates.
(6) The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet may promulgate[adopt] administrative regulations in
accordance with[pursuant to] KRS Chapter 13A necessary to govern the use of those state-owned vehicles
acquired pursuant to the provisions of this section.
(7) Any person violating subsections (2) and (4) of this section shall, on conviction[ thereof], be subject to the
penalties prescribed in KRS 44.990.
Became law without Governor's signature April 9, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version